Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1220
Racehorses; fraudulent acts; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly and willfully to falsify, conceal, or cover up by any trick, scheme, or device a material fact, or make any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statements or representations, or make or use any false writing or document knowing the same to contain any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or entry regarding the prior racing record, pedigree, identity or ownership of a registered animal in any matter related to the breeding, buying, selling, or racing of such animal. Whoever violates any provision of this section shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than five years, or be both so fined and imprisoned.

Laws 1973, LB 178, § 2.